Hawaii statutes.
[§261E-16] Accounts, records, and reports.
The air carrier commission may require annual, periodic, or special reports
from all Hawaii air carriers and related companies. The commission shall
prescribe the manner and form in which the reports shall be made. [L Sp 2008, c
1, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next